Colorado, session 2026A, HB1355.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-105.5-104, amend
(3)(c)(I) introductory portion as follows:
22-105.5-104. Out-of-school time program grant program -
created - use of grants - funding - rules - repeal.
(3) (c) (I) For the 2024-25, 2025-26, and 2026-27 state fiscal years,
the general assembly shall appropriate three million five hundred thousand
dollars in each state fiscal year from the general fund to the department for
purposes of this section. Any unexpended money remaining at the end of
the 2024-25 or 2025-26 state fiscal year from an appropriation made
pursuant to this subsection (3)(c)(I) SECTION:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

SECTION 2. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 long bill.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, to implement this
act, the general fund appropriation made in the annual general appropriation
act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department of education for use
by student pathways for H.B. 24-1331 out-of-school time program grant
program is decreased by $1,750,000.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not require a reduction of an
appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year if:
(a) The amount of the general fund appropriation made in the annual
general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department
of education for use by student pathways for H.B. 24-1331 out-of-school
time program grant program is less than the amount of the adjustment
required in subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) The annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal
year does not include an appropriation to the department of education for
use by student pathways for H.B. 24-1331 out-of-school time program grant
program.
SECTION 3. Effective date. This act takes effect upon passage;
except that section 2 of this act takes effect only if the annual general
appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year becomes law, in which
case section 2 takes effect upon the effective date of this act or the annual
general appropriation act for state fiscal year 2026-27, whichever is later.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1355

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1355